Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.025

Powers as to horizontal property regimes or condominiums.

The words "real estate" and "real property" as used in this title shall include apartments or other portions, however designated, of horizontal property regimes, or a condominium interest in property, as may be created under any laws now in existence or hereafter enacted. A mutual savings bank may do any act necessary or appropriate in connection with its interest in or ownership of any portion of a horizontal property regime or condominium.

[ 1963 c 176 s 10.]

NOTES:

Horizontal property regimes: Chapter 64.32 RCW.